District of Columbia statutes.
47-2003

Reimbursement of vendor for tax.

(a)

Reimbursement for the tax imposed upon the vendor shall be collected by the vendor from the purchaser on all sales the gross receipts from which are subject to the tax imposed by this chapter so far as it can be done. It shall be the duty of each purchaser in the District to reimburse the vendor, as provided in § 47-2004, for the tax imposed by this chapter. Such reimbursement of tax shall be a debt from the purchaser to the vendor and shall be recoverable at law in the same manner as other debts.

(b)

In the event that the vendor shall collect a tax in excess of the reimbursement schedule rates provided for in this chapter, such excess shall be refunded to the purchaser, or in lieu thereof, shall become a debt to the District in the same manner as taxes due and payable under this chapter.

May 27, 1949, 63 Stat. 115, ch. 146, title I, § 126
July 24, 1982, D.C. Law 4-131, § 203, 29 DCR 2418
Sept. 30, 1993, D.C. Law 10-25, § 111(g), 40 DCR 5489
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575
July 13, 2012, D.C. Law 19-149, § 2(a)(3), 59 DCR 5129
Compensating-use tax, collection of tax by vendor, see § 47-2203.
Compensating-use tax, nonresident vendors, see § 47-2204.
This section is referenced in § 47-2004, § 47-2203, and § 47-2204.
1981 Ed., § 47-2003.
1973 Ed., § 47-2603.
D.C. Law 19-149, in subsec. (a), deleted “, except a street vendor as defined in § 47-2002.01(a)(2),” following “by the vendor”.